Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 12 Control of Hazardous Conditions, Preventable Diseases, and Metabolic Disorders
31-12-7.
Rules and regulations regarding tests for sickle cell anemia, sickle cell trait, and other metabolic and genetic disorders; counseling; fees.

In coordination and association with the system established by the department for the screening, retrieval, and diagnosis of certain metabolic and genetic disorders pursuant to Code Section 31-12-6, the department, or its successor agency or department, shall adopt and promulgate appropriate rules and regulations governing tests for sickle cell anemia, sickle cell trait, and other metabolic and genetic disorders as enumerated by the department pursuant to rules and regulations so that as nearly as possible all newborn infants who are susceptible or likely to have sickle cell anemia, sickle cell trait, or other metabolic and genetic disorders shall receive a test for sickle cell anemia, sickle cell trait, or other metabolic and genetic disorders or all of such conditions as soon after birth as successful testing and treatment therefor may be initiated; provided, however, that this Code section shall not apply to any infant whose parents object thereto on the grounds that such tests and treatment conflict with their religious tenets and practices.

If any such child is found to have sickle cell anemia or sickle cell trait, it shall be the duty of the examining physician or the department to inform the parents of such child that the child is so afflicted and, if such child has sickle cell anemia or sickle cell trait, that counseling regarding the nature of the disease, its effects, and its treatment is available without cost from the department and the county board of health or county department of health.

It shall be the duty of the department and each county board of health and county department of health, or their successor agencies or departments, to furnish counseling and advice to any persons requesting such counseling regarding sickle cell anemia or sickle cell trait, its characteristics, symptoms, traits, effects, and treatment. Such counseling shall be furnished without cost to the person requesting it.

The department shall be authorized to establish and periodically adjust, by rule and regulation, fees associated with the screening, retrieval, and diagnosis conducted pursuant to this Code section to help defray or meet the costs incurred by the department; provided, however, that in no event shall the total fees associated with such screening, retrieval, and diagnosis exceed $40.00 for the calendar year beginning January 1, 2007. In no event shall the fees exceed such costs, both direct and indirect, in providing such screenings and related services, provided that no services shall be denied on the basis of inability to pay. All fees paid thereunder shall be paid into the general fund of the State of Georgia.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1201.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1966, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 962, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 416, § 2/HB 1066.

Law reviews.

For article recommending more consistency in age requirements of laws pertaining to the welfare of minors, see 6 Ga. St. B.J. 189 (1969).

31-12-8.
Occupational health and safety.

For the purpose of safeguarding the health of employees and the general public, the department and the county boards of health are empowered to conduct studies and research pertaining to the operation and maintenance of industrial, commercial, business, or other facilities where people congregate or work. The department may issue such orders and directives in any particular instance as shall be necessary to abate or minimize any practice or any operation or condition that constitutes or may be reasonably deemed to constitute a hazard to the health and safety of the employees or the general public. Administrative hearings and reviews and enforcement of such orders and directives shall be governed by Article 1 of Chapter 5 of this title.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1206, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-12-9.
Importation, sale, and breeding of animals and birds to be kept as pets.

In addition to its other powers in the control of preventable diseases, the department may by rule, regulation, and order provide for the licensing, registration, supervision, and investigation of all firms or persons importing, purchasing, breeding, or selling any birds or animals as pets, or any birds or animals which are customarily kept as pets, and may require all such firms or persons to comply with reporting and record-keeping requirements and marking, banding, or other identification requirements. The department is further empowered to prescribe rules and regulations governing the shipment, transportation, or carriage of such birds or animals and require such other control measures deemed necessary to prevent infectious matter present in birds, arthropods, and animals from being conveyed to persons unless the responsibility of such control is by law delegated to some other agency.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1205, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

Cross references.

Authority of Department of Agriculture to quarantine, seize, and destroy birds carrying exotic or untreatable disease, §

4-10-7

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Animal protection, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Agriculture, Animal Health Division, Subject 40-13-13.

Bird dealers licensing, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Agriculture, Animal Health Division, Subject 40-13-12.

31-12-10.
Right of entry to facility.

In carrying out the provisions of this chapter, it shall be the duty of the person in charge of any industrial, commercial, business, or other facility where people work, live, or congregate, upon reasonable notice and at reasonable times, to grant entry to duly authorized agents of the department and of any county board of health.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1207, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-12-11.
Abating operation of bathhouses.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Bathhouse” means a place of public accommodation having facilities including all or some of the following: baths, whirlpools, saunas, massage areas or rooms, and semiprivate or private areas or rooms; and where entry to such place of public accommodation is contingent upon the payment of money on an hourly, daily, weekly, monthly, annual, or club basis; and where the owners or managers or employees of such place of public accommodation knowingly grant or permit the use of such place for illegal sexual activity.

“Illegal sexual activity” means any illegal sexual act involving the sex organs of a person and the mouth, anus, or sex organs of another person.

The operation of bathhouses in this state is declared to be harmful to the public health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of this state.

The department and the county boards of health are empowered to maintain actions for injunction pursuant to Code Section 31-5-9 to abate the operation of any bathhouse in this state as a public nuisance.

The commissioner or the commissioner’s designee or the director of any county board of health is authorized to obtain, pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 5 of this title, inspection warrants for the search or inspection of any property which is a bathhouse.

Any person, firm, corporation, or other business entity which owns, operates, or is a manager for or employee of a bathhouse shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed so as to repeal Code Section 16-6-10, relating to keeping a place of prostitution.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-12-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1208, § 1.

31-12-12.
Restrictions on sale or dispensing of contact lenses and spectacles; definitions; responsibilities relating to prescriptions; criminal violation; enforcement.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Contact lens” means any lens placed directly on the surface of the eye, regardless of whether or not it is intended to correct a visual defect. Contact lens includes, but is not limited to, any cosmetic, therapeutic, or corrective lens.

“Dispense” means the act of furnishing spectacles or contact lenses to an individual.

“Eye examination” means an in-person assessment, which includes telemedicine at a physician’s office or optometrist’s office or in a hospital setting or hospital health system setting in accordance with the applicable standard of care, of the ocular health and visual status of an individual that does not consist of solely objective refractive data or information generated by an automated testing device, including an autorefractor or kiosk, in order to establish a medical diagnosis or for the establishment of refractive error.

“Kiosk” means automatic equipment or application designed to be used on a telephone, a computer, or an Internet based device that can be used either in person or remotely to conduct an eye examination.

“Over-the-counter spectacles” means eyeglasses or lenses in a frame for the correction of vision that may be sold by any person, firm, or corporation at retail without a prescription; these spectacles shall not exceed +3.25 diopters.

“Prescription” means an optometrist’s or ophthalmologist’s handwritten or electronic order based on an eye examination that corrects refractive error.

“Spectacles” means an optical instrument or device worn or used by an individual that has one or more lenses designed to correct or enhance vision addressing the visual needs of the individual wearer, commonly known as glasses or eyeglasses, including spectacles that may be adjusted by the wearer to achieve different types of visual correction or enhancement. Spectacles does not include an optical instrument or device that is not intended to correct or enhance vision or that is sold without consideration of the visual status of the individual who will use the optical instrument or device. Spectacles does not include over-the-counter spectacles.

No person in this state shall sell, dispense, or serve as a conduit for the sale or dispensing of contact lenses or spectacles to the ultimate user of such contact lenses or spectacles except persons licensed and regulated by Chapter 29, 30, or 34 of Title 43.

No person in this state shall write a prescription for contact lenses or spectacles except persons licensed and regulated by Chapter 30 or 34 of Title 43.

No person in this state shall write a prescription for contact lenses or spectacles unless an eye examination is performed. The prescription shall take into consideration any medical findings and any refractive error discovered during the eye examination.

Any person who violates a subparagraph of paragraph (1) of this subsection one or two times shall upon conviction be guilty of a misdemeanor and punished by imprisonment for up to one year or by a fine not to exceed $1,000.00 or by both such fine and imprisonment. Any person who violates a subparagraph of paragraph (1) of this subsection three or more times shall upon conviction be guilty of a felony and punished by imprisonment for one to five years or by a fine not to exceed $10,000.00 or by both such fine and imprisonment.

All contact lenses used in the determination of a contact lens prescription are considered to be diagnostic lenses. After the diagnostic period and the contact lenses have been adequately fitted and the patient released from immediate follow-up care by persons licensed and regulated by Chapter 29, 30, or 34 of Title 43, the prescribing optometrist or ophthalmologist shall, upon the request of the patient, at no cost, provide a prescription in writing for replacement contact lenses. A person shall not dispense or adapt contact lenses or spectacles without first receiving authorization to do so by a written prescription, except when authorized orally to do so by a person licensed and regulated by Chapter 30 or 34 of Title 43.

Patients who comply with such fitting and follow-up requirements as may be established by the prescribing optometrist or ophthalmologist may obtain replacement contact lenses until the expiration date listed on the prescription from a person who may lawfully dispense contact lenses under subsection (b) of this Code section.

A prescriber may refuse to give the patient a copy of the patient’s prescription until the patient has paid for all services rendered in connection with the prescription.

No replacement contact lenses may be sold or dispensed except pursuant to a prescription which:

Conforms to state and federal regulations governing such forms and includes the name, address, and state licensure number of a prescribing practitioner;

Explicitly states an expiration date of not more than 12 months from the date of the last prescribing contact lens examination, unless a medical or refractive problem affecting vision requires an earlier expiration date;

Explicitly states the number of refills;

Explicitly states that it is for contact lenses and indicates the lens brand name and type, including all specifications necessary for the ordering or fabrication of lenses; and

Is kept on file by the person selling or dispensing the replacement contact lenses for at least 24 months after the prescription is filled.

Anyone who fills a prescription bears the full responsibility of the accuracy of the contact lenses or spectacles provided under the prescription. At no time, without the direction of a prescriber, shall any changes or substitutions be made in the brand or type of lenses the prescription calls for with the exceptions of tint change if requested by the patient. However, if a prescription specifies “only” a specific color or tinted lens, those instructions shall be observed.

All sales of and prescriptions for contact lenses in this state shall conform to the federal Fairness to Contact Lens Consumers Act, P.L. 108-164, 15 U.S.C.A. Section 7601, et seq. The provisions of this Code section shall be construed in aid of and in conformity with said federal act.

Civil proceedings to enforce the provisions of this Code section may be brought by any board created under Chapter 29, 30, or 34 of Title 43 or by any other interested person through injunction or other appropriate remedy.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-12-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1003, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1475, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 328, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 903, § 1; Ga. L. 2016, p. 846, § 1/HB 775.

31-12-13.
Definitions concerning bloodborne pathogens; standards; funds for research and development.

For purposes of this Code section, the term:

“Bloodborne pathogens” means pathogenic microorganisms that are present in human blood and can cause disease in humans. These pathogens include, but are not limited to, hepatitis B virus (HBV), hepatitis C virus (HCV), and human immunodeficiency virus (HIV).

“Engineered sharps injury protection” means either:

A physical attribute built into or used with a needle device used for withdrawing body fluids, accessing a vein or artery, or administering medications or other fluids, which effectively reduces the risk of an exposure incident by a mechanism such as barrier creation, blunting, encapsulation, withdrawal, retraction, destruction, or other effective mechanisms; or

A physical attribute built into or used with any other type of needle device or into a nonneedle sharp, which effectively reduces the risk of an exposure incident.

“Exposure incident” means any sharps injury which may reasonably have exposed the person so injured to another person’s blood or other material potentially containing bloodborne pathogens.

“Front-line health care workers” means workers from a variety of occupational classifications and departments, including, but not limited to, registered professional nurses, nurse aids, medical technicians, phlebotomists, and physicians.

“Needleless system” means a device that does not utilize needles for:

The withdrawal of body fluids after initial venous or arterial access is established;

The administration of medication or fluids; or

Any other procedure involving the potential for an exposure incident.

“Public employee” means an employee of a county board of health established in accordance with Chapter 3 of this title or an employee of the state or an agency or authority of the state employed in a public health care facility or other facility providing health care related services, currently not subject to the jurisdiction of the federal Occupational Safety and Health Administration.

“Public employer” means each employer having any public employee with occupational exposure to blood or other material potentially containing bloodborne pathogens.

“Sharp” means any object used or encountered in a health care setting that can be reasonably anticipated to penetrate the skin or any other part of the body and to result in an exposure incident, including, but not limited to, needle devices, scalpels, lancets, broken glass, and broken capillary tubes, but does not include prefilled syringes or other drugs or biologics prepackaged with an administration system requiring federal Food and Drug Administration approval for changes to packaging, labeling, or product.

“Sharps injury” means any injury caused by a sharp, including, but not limited to, cuts, abrasions, or needlesticks.

“Sharps injury log” means a written or electronic record satisfying the requirements of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Code section.

The department shall, no later than January 1, 2001, adopt a bloodborne pathogen standard governing occupational exposure of public employees to blood and other potentially infectious materials. The standard shall be at least as prescriptive as the standard promulgated by the federal Occupational Safety and Health Administration and shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

A requirement that the most effective available needleless systems and sharps with engineered sharps injury protection be included as engineering and work practice controls in all facilities employing public employees except in cases where:

None are available in the marketplace; or

An evaluation committee, established by the employer, at least half the members of which are front-line health care workers, determines by means of objective product evaluation criteria that use of such devices will jeopardize patient or employee safety with regard to a specific medical procedure;

A requirement that each public employer develop and implement an effective written exposure control plan that includes, but is not limited to, procedures for:

Identifying and selecting needleless systems and sharps with engineered sharps injury protection through the evaluation committee described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of this subsection; and

Updating the written exposure control plan when necessary to reflect progress in implementing needleless systems and sharps with engineered sharps injury protection as determined by the evaluation committee described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of this subsection, but in no event less than once every year;

A requirement that information concerning exposure incidents be recorded in a sharps injury log, including, but not limited to:

Date and time of the exposure incident;

Type and brand of sharp involved in the exposure incident; and

Description of the exposure incident which shall include:

Job classification of the exposed employee;

Department or work area where the exposure incident occurred;

The procedure that the exposed employee was performing at the time of the incident;

How the incident occurred;

The body part involved in the exposure incident;

If the sharp had engineered sharps injury protection, whether the protective mechanism was activated, and whether the injury occurred before the protective mechanism was activated, during activation of the mechanism, or after activation of the mechanism, if applicable;

If the sharp had no engineered sharps injury protection, the injured employee’s opinion as to whether and how such a mechanism could have prevented the injury, as well as the basis for the opinion; and

The employee’s opinion about whether any other engineering, administrative, or work practice control could have prevented the injury, as well as the basis for the opinion;

Ensuring that all front-line health care workers are trained on the use of all engineering controls before they are introduced into the clinical setting; and

Establishing an evaluation committee, at least half the members of which are front-line health care workers, to advise the employer on the implementation of the requirements of this Code section. Members of the committee shall be trained in the proper method of utilizing product evaluation criteria prior to the commencement of any product evaluation.

The department shall consider additional enactments as part of the bloodborne pathogen standard to prevent sharps injuries or bloodborne pathogen exposure incidents including, but not limited to, training and educational requirements, measures to increase vaccinations, strategic placement of sharps containers as close to the work area as practical, and increased use of personal protective equipment.

The department shall compile and maintain a list of existing needleless systems and sharps with engineered sharps injury protection, which shall be available to assist public employers in complying with the requirements of the bloodborne pathogen standard adopted pursuant to this Code section. The list may be developed from existing sources of information, including, but not limited to, the federal Food and Drug Administration, the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the National Institute of Occupational Safety and Health, and the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

A fund is established within the department into which moneys may be appropriated to provide for research and development, as well as product evaluations, of needleless systems and sharps with engineered sharps injury protection.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-12-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 544, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 31-12-13, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 927, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 31-12-14.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, in subsection (a), a comma was added following “(HCV)” in paragraph (a)(1), “this title” was substituted for “Title 31” in paragraph (a)(6), and a comma was added following “labeling” near the end of paragraph (a)(8); in subsection (b), a comma was added preceding “or” in division (b)(3)(C)(vi) and a comma was deleted following “criteria” in the second sentence of paragraph (b)(5); and, in the second sentence of subsection (d), a comma was added following “including” and “and Prevention” was inserted.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Sharps injury prevention, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Public Health, Health Promotion, Subject 511-5-9.

31-12-14.
Cancer research program fund; contributions; accounting.

The General Assembly finds that it is in the best interest of the state to provide for cancer research programs. In addition to and as a supplement to traditional financing mechanisms for such programs, it is the policy of this state to enable and encourage citizens voluntarily to support such programs.

To support programs for cancer research, the department may, without limitation, promote and solicit voluntary contributions through the individual income tax return contribution mechanism established in subsection (e) of this Code section or through any fund raising or other promotional techniques deemed appropriate by the department.

There is established a special fund to be known as the “Cancer Research Program Fund.” This fund shall consist of all moneys contributed under subsection (b) of this Code section, all moneys transferred to the department under subsection (e) of this Code section, and any other moneys contributed to this fund. All balances in the fund shall be deposited in an interest-bearing account identifying the fund and shall be carried forward each year so that no part thereof may be deposited in the general treasury. The fund shall be administered and the moneys held in the fund shall be expended by the department through contracts for cancer research conducted in Georgia.

Contributions to the fund shall be deemed supplemental to and shall in no way supplant funding that would otherwise be appropriated for these purposes. Contributions shall only be used for research and for administrative costs authorized in paragraph (2) of subsection (e) of this Code section and shall not be used for personnel or administrative positions. The department shall prepare, by February 1 of each year, an accounting of the moneys received and expended from the fund and a review and evaluation of all expended moneys of the fund. The report shall be made available to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the members of the Board of Public Health, and, upon request, to members of the public.

Unless an earlier date is deemed feasible and is established by the Governor, each Georgia individual income tax return form for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2000, shall contain appropriate language, to be determined by the state revenue commissioner, offering the taxpayer the opportunity to contribute to the Cancer Research Program Fund established in subsection (c) of this Code section by either donating all or any part of any tax refund due, by authorizing a reduction in the refund check otherwise payable, or by contributing any amount over and above any amount of tax owed by adding that amount to the taxpayer’s payment. The instructions accompanying the individual income tax return form shall contain a description of the purposes for which this fund was established and the intended use of moneys received from the contributions. Each taxpayer required to file a state individual income tax return who desires to contribute to such fund may designate such contribution as provided in this Code section on the appropriate individual income tax return form.

The Department of Revenue shall determine annually the total amount so contributed, shall withhold therefrom a reasonable amount for administering this voluntary contribution program, and shall transmit the balance to the department for deposit in the fund established in subsection (c) of this Code section; provided, however, that the amount retained for administrative costs, including implementation costs, shall not exceed $50,000.00 per year. If, in any tax year, the administrative costs of the Department of Revenue for collecting contributions pursuant to this Code section exceed the sum of such contributions, the administrative costs which the Department of Revenue is authorized to withhold from such contributions shall not exceed the sum of such contributions.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-12-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 927, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-5/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p. 686, § 1/SB 201; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-4/HB 214.

Cross references.

Use of marijuana for treatment of cancer and glaucoma, T. 43, C. 34, A. 5.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Cancer state aid program, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Public Health, Health Promotion, Subject 511-5-10.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).